Alabama, session 2026rs, HB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
total of up to $203,404,327 in federal funds from the One Big
Beautiful Bill Act of 2025 (P.L. 119-21) for the Rural Health
Transformation Program to the Alabama Department of Economic
and Community Affairs ("ADECA") for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027:
(1) To the Collaborative EHR, IT, and Cybersecurity
Initiative, up to $31,425,971.
(2) To the Rural Health Initiative, up to $55,936,190.
(3) To the Maternal and Fetal Health Initiative, up to
$6,102,130.
(4) To the Rural Workforce Initiative, up to
$57,919,382.
(5) To the Cancer Digital Regionalization Initiative,
up to $8,136,173.
(6) To the Simulation Training Initiative, up to
$1,017,021.
(7) To the Statewide EMS Trauma and Stroke Initiative,
up to $4,068,085.
(8) To the EMS Treat-In-Place Initiative, up to
Page 1

(8) To the EMS Treat-In-Place Initiative, up to
HB614 Enrolled
$5,085,108.
(9) To the Mental Health Initiative, up to $7,271,705.
(10) To the Rural Health Practice Initiative, up to
$6,102,130.
(11) Up to $20,340,432 of funds may be used to
reimburse costs for the administration, auditing, and
reporting requirements of the Rural Health Transformation
Program funds.
Section 2. All funds appropriated herein and not
expended in the current fiscal year shall not revert but be
carried forward for the purpose appropriated.
Section 3. (a) Any amount of the funds appropriated in
this act remaining unexpended on September 30, 2027, shall be
reappropriated for the same purposes for the fiscal year
beginning October 1, 2027.
(b) In the event that any of the appropriations to any
of the initiatives listed above needs to be adjusted or
exceeded for the utilization of available funds, the Director
of ADECA shall obtain written concurrence of a majority of the
Finance Director, the Chair of the House Ways and Means
General Fund Committee, and the Chair of the Senate Finance
and Taxation General Fund Committee of the Legislature for
such reallocation prior to seeking the approval referenced in
Section (c) below.
(c) Following receipt of the above concurrence, the
Director of ADECA shall seek approval from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS") for the above
reallocation. In the event such approval is modified or
Page 2

reallocation. In the event such approval is modified or
HB614 Enrolled
withheld by CMS, ADECA shall continue to administer the
appropriation in accordance with CMS requirements.
Section 4. Nothing in this act is intended nor shall be
construed to require any expenditure of federal funds in
violation of any federal law, regulation, rule, policy, or
procedure, or of any term or condition applicable to the
administration of federal funds by ADECA in connection with
the Rural Health Transformation Program, nor shall anything
herein be construed to prohibit the expenditure of federal
funds by ADECA in accordance with the purposes for which and
the terms and conditions upon which such funds were made
available.
Section 5. This act shall become effective October 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB614 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 01-Apr-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk



100
101
102 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
103
104
105
Page 4